Hawaii statutes.
[§11-392] House bulletins. The
costs of preparing, printing, and circulating house bulletins and the writings,
drawings, and photographs contained therein, except for paid political
advertisements, shall be exempt from the provisions of this part. [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next